Washington statutes.
RCW 3.70.020

Formalities—Meetings.

Members of the Washington state district and municipal court judges' association may either amend the present bylaws of the association, adopt a constitution, or provide for bylaws only, electing officers as provided therein and doing all things necessary and proper to formally establish a permanent Washington state district and municipal court judges' association. The association may meet each year at a time established by the association's governing board. Meetings shall be held in the state of Washington.

[ 1994 c 32 s 4; 1984 c 258 s 51; 1961 c 299 s 124.]

NOTES:

Court Improvement Act of 1984—Effective dates—Severability—Short title—1984 c 258: See notes following RCW 3.30.010.